Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1408.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Data Center Nondisclosure Agreement Prohibition Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Data center." A facility or group of facilities, including an ancillary use or associated structure located on the same tract or parcel of land, that:(1) is predominantly used to house working servers or similar data storage systems; and(2) has an uninterruptible energy supply or generator backup power, or both, cooling systems, towers and other 123456789101112131415161718 temperature control infrastructure."Public agency." A Commonwealth agency or local agency as defined in section 102 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.Section 3. Prohibition.An agency may not enter into an agreement with the owner or operator of a data center or a person acting on behalf of a data center concerning the construction, development or location of the data center, if the agreement prohibits or otherwise limits the public agency from disclosing information about the data center, the construction, development or location of the data center or the agreement to the public.Section 4. Legal effect.An agreement made in violation of section 3 is void and unenforceable.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1408PN1891 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617